Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2454.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 33-710, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE33-710. Release by foreign personal representative, administrator, guardian or conservator When a personal representative or administrator of the estate of a person who is not a resident of this state at the time of his death has been appointed in another state or foreign country, and no personal representative or administrator has been appointed in this state, or when a guardian or conservator of a minor has been appointed in another state or foreign country, such foreign personal representative, administrator, guardian or conservator, upon recording an authenticated copy of his appointment in the recorder's office of the county in which the mortgage held by the estate of the deceased person or minor is recorded, may execute satisfaction or deeds of release of mortgages upon property located in this state in the same manner as personal representatives, administrators, guardians or conservators appointed in this state. END_STATUTE